Tennessee, session 114, HB0694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-105(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "within ten (10) days" and substituting "within twelve (12) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0694
002394
- 1 -